Maine, session 132, LD1312.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
This bill proposes to explore options for establishing a dedicated source of revenue for
both school construction costs and the Land for Maine's Future Trust Fund.
Page 1 - 132LR1654(01)